Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.450

Water conservation programs—Issuance of revenue bonds.

A county engaged in the sale or distribution of water may issue revenue bonds, or other evidence of indebtedness in the manner provided by this chapter for the purpose of defraying the cost of financing programs for the conservation or more efficient use of water. The bonds or other evidence of indebtedness shall be deemed to be for capital purposes.

[ 1992 c 25 s 2.]